Nevada, session 83, AB272.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 217 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a health care
facility that incurs any costs for a forensic medical examination
shall pay those costs and may not charge the costs directly to the
subject of the forensic medical examination.
2. A health care facility that incurs any costs for a forensic
medical examination may apply to the Department for
reimbursement in an amount determined by the Department for
each forensic medical examination.
3. An application for reimbursement must include
documentation of the services rendered during the forensic
medical examination.
4. The Department shall reimburse a health care facility not
later than 60 days after receiving a completed application for
reimbursement.
5. The Department shall adopt regulations to establish:
(a) The procedures to be followed in the filing and review of
an application for reimbursement, which must comply with all
laws concerning the privacy of information, including, without
limitation, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, as amended, and applicable
regulations; and
(b) The amount to be reimbursed for a forensic medical
examination, which must be reviewed annually by the Department.
6. The filing of a report with the appropriate law enforcement
agency must not be a prerequisite to qualify for a forensic medical
examination pursuant to this section.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Department” means the Department of Health and
Human Services.
(b) “Forensic medical examination” means:
(1) An examination by a provider of health care to obtain
evidence from a victim of sexual assault; or
(2) An examination conducted by a provider of health care
for the purpose of assessing the health care needs of a victim of
domestic violence, a victim of strangulation or a victim of human
trafficking and coordinating the treatment of any injuries of the
victim.
(c) “Health care facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.471.
-
*AB272*

– 3 –
(d) “Victim of domestic violence” means a person who is the
victim of the commission of any act described in NRS 33.018.
(e) “Victim of human trafficking” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 217.520.
(f) “Victim of sexual assault” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 217.280.
(g) “Victim of strangulation” means a person who is a victim
of a battery which is committed by strangulation as described in
NRS 200.481.
Sec. 2. NRS 217.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
217.160 1. The compensation officer may order the payment
of compensation:
(a) To or for the benefit of the victim.
(b) If the victim has suffered personal injury, to any person
responsible for the maintenance of the victim who has suffered
pecuniary loss or incurred expenses as a result of the injury.
(c) If the victim dies, to or for the benefit of any one or more of
the dependents of the victim.
(d) To a minor who is a member of the household or immediate
family of a victim of a battery which constitutes domestic violence
pursuant to NRS 33.018 who needs an assessment, a psychological
evaluation or psychological counseling for emotional trauma
suffered by the minor as a result of the battery.
(e) To a member of the victim’s household or immediate family
for psychological counseling for emotional trauma suffered by the
member as a result of the crime of murder as defined in
NRS 200.010.
[(f) To a county in whose jurisdiction a sexual assault was
committed for the reimbursement of costs associated with a forensic
medical examination of a victim of sexual assault that are paid by
the county pursuant to NRS 217.300. A county may be reimbursed
pursuant to this paragraph in an amount equal to the cost of 10
forensic medical examinations or $10,000, whichever is less, each
fiscal year.]
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” has the meaning ascribed to it in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 200.481.
(b) [“Forensic medical examination” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 217.300.
(c)] “Household” means an association of persons who live in
the same home or dwelling and who:
(1) Have significant personal ties to the victim; or
(2) Are related by blood, adoption or marriage, within the
first degree of consanguinity or affinity.
-
*AB272*

– 4 –
[(d)] (c) “Immediate family” means persons who are related by
blood, adoption or marriage, within the first degree of consanguinity
or affinity.
[(e) “Victim of sexual assault” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 217.280.]
Sec. 3. NRS 217.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
217.300 1. The county in whose jurisdiction a sexual assault
is committed shall [:
(a) Pay] pay any costs incurred for medical care for any physical
injuries resulting from the sexual assault which is provided to the
victim not later than 72 hours after the victim first arrives for
treatment.
[(b) Pay any costs incurred by a hospital for the forensic medical
examination of the victim.]
2. Any costs incurred pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Must not be charged directly to the victim of sexual assault.
(b) Must be charged to the county in whose jurisdiction the
offense was committed.
[3. The filing of a report with the appropriate law enforcement
agency must not be a prerequisite to qualify for a forensic medical
examination pursuant to this section.
4. The costs associated with a forensic medical examination
must not be included in the costs for medical treatment pursuant to
NRS 217.310.
5. As used in this section, “forensic medical examination”
means an examination by a health care provider to obtain evidence
from a victim of sexual assault.]
Sec. 4. NRS 217.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
217.310 1. If any victim of sexual assault requires medical
treatment for physical injuries as a result of the sexual assault, in
addition to any initial emergency medical care provided, or if any
victim or spouse of such a victim suffers emotional trauma as a
result of the sexual assault, the victim or spouse may, upon
submitting an affidavit as required by subsection 2, apply to the
board of county commissioners in the county where the sexual
assault occurred for treatment at county expense.
2. The board shall approve an application for treatment upon
receiving an affidavit from the applicant declaring that:
(a) The applicant is a victim of sexual assault or spouse of such
a victim;
(b) The sexual assault occurred in the county; and
(c) The victim requires medical treatment for physical injuries,
or the victim or spouse has suffered emotional trauma, as a result of
the sexual assault.
-
*AB272*

– 5 –
3. A victim who has suffered emotional trauma may select a
relative or close friend to receive counseling with the victim if the
counselor agrees that such companionship will be helpful to the
victim. If the victim’s application for treatment is approved,
counseling for the relative or friend must also be approved.
4. A victim must file a report with the appropriate law
enforcement agency or submit to a forensic medical examination
pursuant to [NRS 217.300] section 1 of this act as a prerequisite for
the victim or any other person eligible to qualify for treatment under
the provisions of this section.
5. Whenever costs are incurred by a hospital for treatment
which has been approved by the board of county commissioners
pursuant to this section for the victim of a sexual assault and any
other person eligible for treatment, the costs of the treatment, not to
exceed $1,000, must be charged to the county which authorized the
treatment. Any remainder must be handled the same as other
hospital costs.
6. The costs associated with a forensic medical examination
must not be included in the costs for medical treatment under this
section.
7. As used in this section, “forensic medical examination”
means an examination by a provider of health care to obtain
evidence from a victim of sexual assault.
Sec. 5. NRS 178A.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178A.060 “Forensic medical examination” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS [217.300.] 217.310.
Sec. 6. NRS 178A.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178A.190 1. If a survivor requests a consultation with a
sexual assault victims’ advocate or an attendant to provide support
to the survivor pursuant to NRS 178A.170, the medical provider
shall summon the sexual assault victims’ advocate or attendant
before the commencement of the forensic medical examination.
2. If a sexual assault victims’ advocate or an attendant to
provide support to the survivor pursuant to NRS 178A.170 cannot
be summoned in a timely manner, the medical provider shall inform
the survivor of the ramifications of delaying the forensic medical
examination.
3. A survivor must not be required to pay any expense related
to a forensic medical examination pursuant to [NRS 217.300.]
section 1 of this act.
4. After the forensic medical examination, the survivor has the
right to use a shower apparatus at no cost, unless a facility which
includes a shower apparatus is not available.
5. Before a medical provider commences a forensic medical
examination, the medical provider shall inform the survivor of his or
-
*AB272*

– 6 –
her rights pursuant to the Sexual Assault Survivors’ Bill of Rights
and other relevant law by presenting a document developed by the
Office of the Attorney General pursuant to NRS 178A.270.
6. The person who presents to the survivor the document
developed by the Office of the Attorney General pursuant to NRS
178A.270 shall sign a written acknowledgment indicating that the
person presented the document to the survivor. The written
acknowledgment must be retained in the case file of the survivor.
Sec. 7. NRS 200.364 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.364 As used in NRS 200.364 to 200.3788, inclusive,
unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Forensic laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 176.09117.
2. “Forensic medical examination” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS [217.300.] 217.310.
3. “Genetic marker analysis” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 176.09118.
4. “Offense involving a pupil or child” means any of the
following offenses:
(a) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school or
volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
(b) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college or
university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
(c) Sexual conduct between certain employees or contractors of
or volunteers for an entity which provides services to children and a
person under the care, custody, control or supervision of the entity
pursuant to NRS 201.555.
5. “Perpetrator” means a person who commits a sexual offense,
an offense involving a pupil or child or sex trafficking.
6. “Sex trafficking” means a violation of subsection 2 of
NRS 201.300.
7. “Sexual assault forensic evidence kit” means the forensic
evidence obtained from a forensic medical examination.
8. “Sexual offense” means any of the following offenses:
(a) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366.
(b) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368.
9. “Sexual penetration” means cunnilingus, fellatio, or any
intrusion, however slight, of any part of a person’s body or any
object manipulated or inserted by a person into the genital or anal
openings of the body of another, including sexual intercourse in its
ordinary meaning. The term does not include any such conduct for
medical purposes.
10. “Statutory sexual seduction” means ordinary sexual
intercourse, anal intercourse or sexual penetration committed by a
-
*AB272*

– 7 –
person 18 years of age or older with a person who is 14 or 15 years
of age and who is at least 4 years younger than the perpetrator.
11. “Victim” means a person who is a victim of a sexual
offense, an offense involving a pupil or child or sex trafficking.
12. “Victim of sexual assault” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 217.280.
Sec. 8. NRS 388.1347 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.1347 1. The board of trustees of each school district shall
enter into a memorandum of understanding with a community-based
organization that assists victims of power-based violence. The
memorandum of understanding may, without limitation:
(a) Allow for cooperation and training between the school
district and the community-based organization that assists victims of
power-based violence to establish an understanding of the:
(1) Responsibilities that the school district and the
community-based organization that assists victims of power-based
violence have in responding to a report or disclosure of an alleged
incident of power-based violence; and
(2) Procedures of the school district for providing support
and services to pupils and employees.
(b) Require a community-based organization that assists victims
of power-based violence to:
(1) Assist with developing policies, programming or training
for the school district regarding power-based violence;
(2) Provide an alternative for a pupil or employee of the
school district to receive free counseling, advocacy or crisis services
related to an alleged incident of power-based violence, including,
without limitation, access to a health care provider who specializes
in forensic medical examinations;
(3) Assist with the development and implementation of
education and prevention programs for pupils enrolled at a public
school in the school district; and
(4) Assist with the development and implementation of
training and prevention curriculum for employees of the school
district.
(c) Include a fee structure for any services provided by the
community-based organization that assists victims of power-based
violence.
2. If a teacher or administrator is informed by a pupil that the
pupil has been a victim of power-based violence, the teacher or
administrator shall refer the pupil to the community-based
organization that assists victims of power-based violence.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Forensic medical examination” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS [217.300.] 217.310.
-
*AB272*

– 8 –
(b) “Power-based violence” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 396.1285.
Sec. 9. NRS 388A.3938 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.3938 1. The governing body of each charter school
shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with a community-
based organization that assists victims of power-based violence. The
memorandum of understanding may, without limitation:
(a) Allow for cooperation and training between the charter
school and the community-based organization that assists victims of
power-based violence to establish an understanding of the:
(1) Responsibilities that the charter school and the
community-based organization that assists victims of power-based
violence have in responding to a report or disclosure of an alleged
incident of power-based violence; and
(2) Procedures of the charter school for providing support
and services to pupils and employees.
(b) Require a community-based organization that assists victims
of power-based violence to:
(1) Assist with developing policies, programming or training
for the charter school regarding power-based violence;
(2) Provide an alternative for a pupil or employee of the
charter school to receive free counseling, advocacy or crisis services
related to an alleged incident of power-based violence, including,
without limitation, access to a health care provider who specializes
in forensic medical examinations;
(3) Assist with the development and implementation of
education and prevention programs for pupils enrolled at the charter
school; and
(4) Assist with the development and implementation of
training and prevention curriculum for employees of the charter
school.
(c) Include a fee structure for any services provided by the
community-based organization that assists victims of power-based
violence.
2. If a teacher or administrator of the charter school is informed
by a pupil that the pupil has been a victim of power-based violence,
the teacher or administrator shall refer the pupil to the community-
based organization that assists victims of power-based violence.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Forensic medical examination” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS [217.300.] 217.310.
(b) “Power-based violence” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 396.1285.
-
*AB272*

– 9 –
Sec. 10. NRS 388C.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388C.160 1. The governing body of each university school
for profoundly gifted pupils shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding with a community-based organization that assists
victims of power-based violence. The memorandum of
understanding may, without limitation:
(a) Allow for cooperation and training between the university
school for profoundly gifted pupils and the community-based
organization that assists victims of power-based violence to
establish an understanding of the:
(1) Responsibilities that the university school for profoundly
gifted pupils and the community-based organization that assists
victims of power-based violence have in responding to a report or
disclosure of an alleged incident of power-based violence; and
(2) Procedures of the university school for profoundly gifted
pupils for providing support and services to pupils and employees.
(b) Require a community-based organization that assists victims
of power-based violence to:
(1) Assist with developing policies, programming or training
for the university school for profoundly gifted pupils regarding
power-based violence;
(2) Provide an alternative for a pupil or employee of the
university school for profoundly gifted pupils to receive free
counseling, advocacy or crisis services related to an alleged incident
of power-based violence, including, without limitation, access to a
health care provider who specializes in forensic medical
examinations;
(3) Assist with the development and implementation of
education and prevention programs for pupils enrolled at the
university school for profoundly gifted pupils; and
(4) Assist with the development and implementation of
training and prevention curriculum for employees of the university
school for profoundly gifted pupils.
(c) Include a fee structure for any services provided by the
community-based organization that assists victims of power-based
violence.
2. If a teacher or administrator of the university school for
profoundly gifted pupils is informed by a pupil that the pupil has
been a victim of power-based violence, the teacher or administrator
shall refer the pupil to the community-based organization that assists
victims of power-based violence.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Forensic medical examination” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS [217.300.] 217.310.
-
*AB272*

– 10 –
(b) “Power-based violence” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 396.1285.
Sec. 11. NRS 396.147 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.147 1. The Board of Regents may require an institution
within the System to enter into a memorandum of understanding
with an organization that assists persons involved in power-based
violence. The memorandum of understanding may, without
limitation:
(a) Allow for cooperation and training between the institution
and the organization that assists persons involved in power-based
violence to establish an understanding of the:
(1) Responsibilities that the institution and organization that
assists persons involved in power-based violence have in responding
to a report or disclosure of an alleged incident of power-based
violence; and
(2) Procedures of the institution for providing support and
services to students and employees;
(b) Require an organization that assists persons involved in
power-based violence to:
(1) Assist with developing policies, programming or training
at the institution regarding power-based violence;
(2) Provide an alternative for a student or employee of the
institution to receive free and confidential counseling, advocacy or
crisis services related to an alleged incident of power-based violence
that are located on or off a campus of the institution, including,
without limitation:
(I) Access to a health care provider who specializes in
forensic medical examinations; and
(II) Confidential services;
(3) Assist with the development and implementation of
education and prevention programs for students of the institution;
and
(4) Assist with the development and implementation of
training and prevention curriculum for employees of the institution;
and
(c) Include a fee structure for any services provided by the
organization that assists persons involved in power-based violence.
2. As used in this section, “forensic medical examination” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS [217.300.] 217.310.
Sec. 12. NRS 629.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.085 1. A provider of health care shall not:
(a) Perform or supervise the performance of a pelvic
examination that the provider of health care is not appropriately
licensed, certified or registered to perform or is not within the scope
of practice of the provider of health care; or
-
*AB272*

– 11 –
(b) Perform a pelvic examination on an anesthetized or
unconscious patient or supervise the performance of a pelvic
examination on such a patient without first obtaining the informed
consent of the patient unless:
(1) The pelvic examination is within the scope of a surgical
procedure or diagnostic examination to which the patient has given
informed consent; or
(2) In the case of an unconscious patient:
(I) The pelvic examination is required for diagnostic
purposes and is medically necessary; or
(II) The patient is an alleged victim of a sexual assault
and the physician or physician assistant reasonably concludes that
exigent circumstances justify conducting a forensic medical
examination which requires the pelvic examination.
2. A person who is not licensed, certified or registered as a
provider of health care and is working under the supervision of a
provider of health care, including, without limitation, a student or
trainee, shall not:
(a) Perform or supervise the performance of any pelvic
examination that his or her supervising provider of health care is
prohibited by subsection 1 from supervising; or
(b) Supervise the performance of a pelvic examination by any
other person outside the immediate presence of his or her
supervising provider of health care.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Forensic medical examination” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS [217.300.] 217.310.
(b) “Sexual assault” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.366.
Sec. 13. NRS 217.405 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 14. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 13, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting
regulations and performing other preparatory administrative tasks
that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
217.405 Payment of costs incurred by hospital for
strangulation forensic medical examination.
-
*AB272*

– 12 –
1. The county in whose jurisdiction a domestic violence battery
by strangulation is committed shall pay any costs incurred by a
hospital for a strangulation forensic medical examination of the
victim.
2. Any costs incurred pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Must not be charged directly to the victim.
(b) Must be charged to the county in whose jurisdiction the
offense was committed.
3. A county which pays costs related to a strangulation forensic
medical examination pursuant to subsection 1 may, to the extent that
money is available for that purpose from legislative appropriation,
receive reimbursement from the State.
4. The filing of a report with the appropriate law enforcement
agency must not be a prerequisite to qualify for a strangulation
forensic medical examination pursuant to this section.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the use
of evidence obtained from a strangulation forensic medical
examination during the investigation or prosecution of a person for
domestic violence battery by strangulation.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Domestic violence battery by strangulation” means a
battery which constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018
that is committed by strangulation as described in NRS 200.481.
(b) “Strangulation forensic medical examination” means an
examination conducted by a health care provider for the purpose of
assessing the health care needs of a victim of a domestic violence
battery by strangulation and coordinating the treatment of any
injuries of the victim.
H
-
*AB272*